Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.09.060

Conduct of elections.

The election of the charter commission and the election upon the proposition of adopting the proposed new, altered, or revised charter, may be general or special elections held within the corresponding time period specified in chapter 35A.08 RCW, and except as herein provided, said elections, the notice specifying the objects thereof, the returns, the canvassing, and the declaration of the result shall be governed by the laws regulating and controlling elections in the charter code city.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.09.060.]